Massachusetts, session 194th, H5246.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement
shall credit Jason Patrissi, an employee of the probation service and a member of the state
employees’ retirement system, with up to 6 years of creditable service for the purpose of
calculating his superannuation retirement allowance under paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of
section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, for service rendered for the state of Vermont’s
department of corrections from December 1998 to March 2006; provided, that such service
rendered in Vermont was equivalent to the service rendered by Jason Patrissi in the
Massachusetts probation service, as determined by the state board of retirement; and provided
further, that Jason Patrissi shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the state employees’
retirement system, in 1 sum or installments and upon such terms and conditions as the state
of 2

board of retirement may prescribe, an amount equal to the contributions that would have been
withheld as regular deductions from his regular compensation for such period of service, together
with regular interest thereon, as determined by the board.
of 2